src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BIEGGAT_IV !!= @CODE@ Impersonals
           +IV:           DeverbalVerbsBIEGGAT ;
           +IV:%>         BIEGGATinfl          ;
           +IV:           SG3PASSV             ;
!          +IV:           SG3PASSEVEN          ;
  +IV+Cond+Sg3:%>»Y2luluj K                    ; ! not sure if impersonal verbs even take conditionalis, as it is not very productive will not continue to give impersonal verbs this form

!!€gt-norm: dednjat # Even-syllable test
!!€ dædnjá:           dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ dädnjá:           dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ denjaj:          dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTET_IV   !!= @CODE@ Like RAVGGAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
       +IV:%>        RAVGGALASSTETStem ;
       +IV:          SG3PASSV          ;
!      +IV:          SG3PASSEVEN       ;
  +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET        ;


!!€gt-norm: dehpudallat # Even-syllable test
!!€ dehpudaláv:           dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ dehpudalliv:          dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ dehpudalájma:         dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BIEKKASTALLAT_IV !!= @CODE@ Already derived impersonals
  +IV:%> BIEGGATinfl ;
! +IV:   SG3PASSV    ;
! +IV:   SG3PASSEVEN ;

!!€gt-norm: dehpudallat # Even-syllable test
!!€ duhpárasstá:           duhpárasstet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ duhpárastij:          duhpárasstet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3


LEXICON GUOTTEDALLAT_IV   !!= @CODE@ passives on -allat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
!                  +IV:%>          RAVGGALASSTETStem       ; !replaced to avoid pass  + ACTORder
  +IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahte%> INFL-EVEN               ;
                   +IV:%>          INFL-EVEN               ;
    +IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:%>»Y3liss   LIS                     ;
         +IV+Actio+Nom:m           K                       ;
         +IV+Actio+Gen:ma          K                       ;
         +IV+Actio+Com:mijn        K                       ;
         +IV+Actio+Ess:min         K                       ;
         +IV+Actio+Ela:mis         K                       ;
              +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET              ;
          @C.NeedNoun@             GUOTTEDALLAT_IV_flagged ;

LEXICON GUOTTEDALLAT_IV_flagged
  +IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:%>»muss MUS          ;
 +IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:%>»m    BASSALASSTEM ;

!!€gt-norm: duolmudallat # Even-syllable test
!!€ duolmudaláv:           duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ duolmudalliv:          duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ duolmudalájma:         duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON HIEBADUVVAT_IV  !!= @CODE@ passives on -uvvat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
!                +V+IV:uvva%>          RAVGGALASSTETStem      ; !replaced to avoid pass + ACTORder
  +IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:uvva%>»goahte%> INFL-EVEN              ;
                   +IV:uvva%>          INFL-EVEN              ;
    +IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:uvva%>»Y3liss   LIS                    ;
         +IV+Actio+Nom:uvva%>m         K                      ;
         +IV+Actio+Gen:uvva%>ma        K                      ;
         +IV+Actio+Com:uvva%>mijn      K                      ;
         +IV+Actio+Ess:uvva%>min       K                      ;
         +IV+Actio+Ela:uvva%>mis       K                      ;
              +IV+Cond:uvva%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET             ;
          @C.NeedNoun@                 HIEBADUVVAT_IV_flagged ;
LEXICON HIEBADUVVAT_IV_flagged
          +IV+PrfPrc:uvva%>m     K            ;
   +IV+PrfPrc+Use/NG:um%>        K            ;
  +IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:uvva%>»muss MUS          ;
 +IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:uvva%>»m    BASSALASSTEM ;
!!€gt-norm: duostoduvvat # Even-syllable test
!!€ duostoduváv:           duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ duostoduvviv:          duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ duostoduvájma:         duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

!!
!!
!! Transitives
!!
!!
LEXICON MÁHTTET_TV  !!= @CODE@  verbs without personal passive
            +TV:%>          BASSATStem           ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
            +TV:            SG3PASSV             ;
            +TV:            SG3PASSEVEN          ;
+IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET           ;

!!€gt-norm: jáhkket # Even-syllable test
!!€ jáhkáv:           jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ jáhkkiv:          jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jáhkijma:         jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BASSAT_TV  !!= @CODE@ a- and å-verbs. Three passives
            +TV:%>          BASSATStem          ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE        ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: jåksåt # Even-syllable test
!!€ jåvsåv:           jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ jåksiv:          jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jåvsåjma:         jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BASSALASSTET_TV  !!= @CODE@ Like BASSAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced. Three passives
            +TV:%>          BASSALASSTETStem ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE     ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET       ;

!!€gt-norm: jårgudallat # Even-syllable test
!!€ jårgudaláv:           jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ jårgudalliv:          jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jårgudalájma:         jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV  !!= @CODE@ Like BASSALASSTET_TV, but for words ending on -ahttet. Diffrence is Use/NG an Use/-Spell for NomAg "hiejedahttijn", since this is rearly used an is mixed up with gerundium "hiejtedattijn". Like BASSAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced. Three passives
            +TV:%>          HIEJTEDAHTTETStem ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE     ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET       ;

!!€gt-norm: jårgudallat # Even-syllable test
!!€ jårgudaláv:           jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ jårgudalliv:          jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jårgudalájma:         jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON JUHKAT_TV  !!= @CODE@ a-verbs like BASSAT_TV but but without derivations -stit, -stallat, -stahttet, - stasstet. Dim -istit that are hardcoded. Three passives
            +TV:%>          BASSATStem          ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsJUHKAT ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE        ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: njammat # Even-syllable test
!!€ njamáv:           njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ njammiv:          njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ njamájma:         njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON LÁHPPET_TV  !!= @CODE@ e-verbs. Three passives
            +TV:%>          BASSATStem           ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE         ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET           ;

!!€gt-norm: oajttet # Even-syllable test
!!€ oajtáv:           oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ oajttiv:          oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ åjtijma:         oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON JIEHKET_TV  !!= @CODE@ e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT. Three passives
            +TV:%>          JIEHKETStem          ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
            +TV:            EVEN-PASSIVE         ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu   V-ODD-PRET           ;

!!€gt-norm: sievvet # Even-syllable test
!!€ sæváv:           sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ säváv:           sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ sievviv:          sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ sievijma:         sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
