src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
biebmoduvvat+V:biebmod HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
bieggat+V:biegga BIEGGAT_IV ;
bievllat+V:bievlla BIEGGAT_IV ;
biktasijt% bassat+V+Use/MT:biktasijt% bassa BASSAT_TV ;
birástahttet+V:birástahtte BASSALASSTET_TV ;
boadádallat+V:boadádalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
buojkodahttet+V:buojkodahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
buvvet+V:buvve LÁHPPET_TV ;
báhtsadallat+V:báhtsadalla RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
báruduvvat+V:bárud HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
bårådahttet+V:bårådahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
båstådallat+V:båstådalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
dahppat+V:dahppa BASSAT_TV ;
dednjat+V:dednja BIEGGAT_IV ;
diejttet+V:diejtte LÁHPPET_TV ;
dilmmat+V:dilmma BIEGGAT_IV ;
doalvoduvvat+V:doalvod HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
duhpárasstet+V:duhpárasste BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
dábbánasstet+V:dábbánasste RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
dálvvat+V:dálvva BIEGGAT_IV ;
dåbdustallat+V:dåbdustalla BASSALASSTET_TV ;
dæmssat+V:dæmssa BASSAT_TV ;
eldagasstet+V:eldagasste BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
fárváldahttet+V:fárváldahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
garŋŋeladdat+V:garŋŋeladda RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
gerdudallat+V:gerdudalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
giedjegáhttet+V:giedjegáhtte BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
giehtadaláduvvat+V:giehtadalád HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
gierret+V:gierre JIEHKET_TV ;
giessat+V:giessa BASSAT_TV ;
giesset+V:giesse JIEHKET_TV ;
gijttet+V:gijtte LÁHPPET_TV ;
guládallat+V:guládalla BASSALASSTET_TV ;
guoktáladdat+V+Err/Orth:guoktáladde RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
guottedallat+V:guottedalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
guovsagahttet+V:guovsagahtte BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
gáhtat+V:gáhta BASSAT_TV ;
gártjedahttet+V:gártjedahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
gåddudallat+V:gåddudalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
gåjkkåluvvat+V:gåjkkål HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
gåttedallat+V:gåttedalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
hamustallat+V:hamustalla RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
harvvet+V:harvve BIEGGAT_IV ;
herskudallat+V:herskudalla BASSALASSTET_TV ;
hiejtedahttet+V:hiejtedahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
hiepptet+V:hieppte LÁHPPET_TV ;
hálldat+V:hállda BASSAT_TV ;
hávddáduvvat+V:hávddád HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
iellet+V:ielle JIEHKET_TV ;
irgástallat+V:irgástalla RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
jiehket+V:jiehke JIEHKET_TV ;
juhkat+V:juhka JUHKAT_TV ;
jussket+V:jusske LÁHPPET_TV ;
juvlliduvvat+V:juvllid HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
jáhkket+V:jáhkke MÁHTTET_TV ;
jálusmuhttet+V:jálusmuhtte BASSALASSTET_TV ;
labudahttet+V:labudahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
labudallat+V:labudalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
luspástahttet+V:luspástahtte RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
láhostahttet+V:láhostahtte BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
lárkket+V:lárkke LÁHPPET_TV ;
láŋasmuvvat+V:láŋasm HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
mujttádahttet+V:mujttádahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
muohttet+V:muohtte BIEGGAT_IV ;
máhttet+V+Err/Orth:máhtte MÁHTTET_TV ;
máhttet+V:máhtte MÁHTTET_TV ;
málástallat+V:málástalla BASSALASSTET_TV ;
nagerduvvat+V:nagerd HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
niejddet+V:niejdde LÁHPPET_TV ;
njammat+V:njamma JUHKAT_TV ;
njiellat+V:njiella BASSAT_TV ;
njimmuraddat+V:njimmuradda RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
nággidallat+V:nággidalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
rammkalasstet+V:rammkalasste RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
rievddadasstet+V:rievddadasste BASSALASSTET_TV ;
ruosskidallat+V:ruosskidalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
rájaduvvat+V:rájad HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
rámmpat+V:rámmpa BASSAT_TV ;
rássjudallat+V:rássjudalla BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
råtjadahttet+V:råtjadahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
ræjvadallat+V:ræjvadalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ; !strange, rejvadallat or ræjvádallat!!!
siebllat+V:sieblla BIEGGAT_IV ;
siektet+V:siekte LÁHPPET_TV ;
sievvet+V:sievve JIEHKET_TV ;
sjållårdallat+V:sjållårdalla RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
skibludallat+V:skibludalla BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
skámádahttet+V:skámádahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
slahttet+V:slahtte BIEGGAT_IV ;
småråstahttet+V:småråstahtte BIEKKASTALLAT_IV ;
snjuhpat+v1+V:snjuhpa BASSAT_TV ;
suohkunahttet+V:suohkunahtte BASSALASSTET_TV ;
såhpåt+V:såhpå BASSAT_TV ;
såjåldahttet+V:såjåldahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
tjarvvat+V:tjarvva BIEGGAT_IV ;
tjassket+V:tjasske LÁHPPET_TV ;
tjoahkkáj% giesset+V+Use/MT:tjoahkkáj% giesse JIEHKET_TV ;
tjoahkkájgiesset+V+Err/Cmp:tjoahkkáj#giesse JIEHKET_TV ;
tjuodtjánasstet+V:tjuodtjánasste RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
tjågŋåguvvat+V:tjågŋåg HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
tsuojggidallat+V:tsuojggidalla GUOTTEDALLAT_IV ;
uhtsalussjat+V:uhtsalussja BASSAT_TV ;
unnedasstet+V:unnedasste BASSALASSTET_TV ;
vierajdahttet+V:vierajdahtte HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV ;
vierddet+V:vierdde LÁHPPET_TV ;
vitsárdallat+V:vitsárdalla RAVGGALASSTET_IV ;
vuosudallat+V:vuosudalla BASSALASSTET_TV ;
væjoduvvat+V:væjod HIEBADUVVAT_IV ;
ådåstuhttet+V:ådåstuhtte BASSALASSTET_TV ;
åvddånbuktet+V+Err/Cmp:åvddån#bukte LÁHPPET_TV ;
